Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6862YC (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 152B.14, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 152B.14 Licensure through examination. 3 1. The Prior to January 1, 2027, the board shall issue a 4 license to practice respiratory care to an applicant who has 5 passed an examination administered by the state or a national 6 agency approved by the board. 7 2. Beginning January 1, 2027, the board shall issue a 8 license to practice respiratory care to an applicant who has 9 passed an examination administered by the state or a national 10 agency approved by the board, and who meets the requirements 11 of section 152B.15. 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 152B.15 Registered respiratory care 13 therapist credential required ââ exceptions. 14 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, an applicant for licensure 15 as a respiratory care practitioner must submit to the board 16 evidence of achievement of the registered respiratory therapist 17 credential awarded by the national board for respiratory 18 care, or its successor organization, in addition to any other 19 requirements adopted by the board by rule. 20 2. Beginning January 1, 2027, an applicant for licensure 21 as a respiratory care practitioner who is currently licensed 22 as a respiratory care practitioner in another state must 23 submit to the board evidence of achievement of the registered 24 respiratory therapist credential awarded by the national board 25 for respiratory care, or its successor organization, or the 26 completion of an examination approved by the board by rule, 27 in addition to any other requirements adopted by the board by 28 rule. 29 3. A respiratory care practitioner licensed in this state 30 prior to January 1, 2027, is not required to hold a registered 31 respiratory therapist credential awarded by the national board 32 for respiratory care, or its successor organization, to renew a 33 license, unless the license lapsed more than three months prior 34 to renewal. 35 -1- LSB 6862YC (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 2 H.F. _____ 4. The board shall cooperate with educational institutions 1 and professional organizations to develop pathways for persons 2 who currently hold a certified respiratory therapist credential 3 awarded by the national board for respiratory care to obtain 4 a registered respiratory therapist credential awarded by the 5 national board for respiratory care, and to create continuing 6 education opportunities to support the professional development 7 of respiratory care practitioners. 8